Utah statutes.
70A-7a-304.   Tangible bills of lading in a set.
(1)  Except as customary in international transportation, a tangible bill of
lading may not be issued in a set of parts.  The issuer is liable for damages
caused by violation of this Subsection (1).
(2)  If a tangible bill of lading is lawfully issued in a set of parts, each
of which contains an identification code and is expressed to be valid only if
the goods have not been delivered against any other part, the whole of the
parts constitutes one bill.
(3)  If a tangible negotiable bill of lading is lawfully issued in a set of
parts and different parts are negotiated to different persons, the title of
the holder to which the first due negotiation is made prevails as to both the
document of title and the goods even if any later holder may have received the
goods from the carrier in good faith and discharged the carrier's obligation
by surrendering its part.
(4)  A person that negotiates or transfers a single part of a tangible bill of
lading issued in a set is liable to holders of that part as if it were the
whole set.
(5)  The bailee shall deliver in accordance with Chapter 4, Uniform Commercial
Code - Bank Deposits and Collections, against the first presented part of a
tangible bill of lading lawfully issued in a set.  Delivery in this manner
discharges the bailee's obligation on the whole bill.
